Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.060

License required—Penalty—Exemptions.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this chapter shall be considered to be "in good standing" except when:

(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been renewed in accordance with RCW 18.16.110;

(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW 18.16.210, * 18.16.230, or 18.16.240, and has not been reinstated;

(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with an order of the director issued under RCW 18.16.210 requiring the licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional training; or

(d) The license has been placed on inactive status at the request of the licensee, and has not been reinstated in accordance with RCW 18.16.110(3).

(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and 18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter:

(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, engages in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring;

(b) Instructs in a school;

(c) Operates a school; or

(d) Operates a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit.

(3) A person who receives a license as an instructor may engage in the commercial practice for which he or she held a license when applying for the instructor license without also renewing the previously held license. However, a person licensed as an instructor whose license to engage in a commercial practice is not or at any time was not renewed may not engage in the commercial practice previously permitted under that license unless that person renews the previously held license.

(4) An apprentice actively enrolled in an apprenticeship program for cosmetology, barbering, hair design, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring may engage in the commercial practice as required for the apprenticeship program.

[ 2015 c 62 s 4; 2013 c 187 s 4; 2008 c 20 s 4; 2004 c 51 s 1. Prior: 2002 c 111 s 5; 2002 c 86 s 214; 1991 c 324 s 4; 1984 c 208 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.16.230 was repealed by 2018 c 199 s 101.

Notice of chapter 51, Laws of 2004—2004 c 51: "The department of licensing shall:

(1) Within ninety days after March 22, 2004, notify each person who held a cosmetology, barber, manicurist, or esthetician license between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, of the provisions of this act by mailing a notice as specified in this section to the licensee's last known mailing address;

(2) Include in the notice required by this section:

(a) A summary of this act, including a summary of the requirements for (i) renewing and obtaining additional licenses; and (ii) requesting placement on inactive status;

(b) A telephone number within the department for obtaining further information;

(c) The department's internet address; and

(d) On the outside of the notice, a facsimile of the state seal, the department's return address, and the words "Notice of Legislative Changes — Cosmetology, Barbering, Manicuring, and Esthetics Licensing Information Enclosed" in conspicuous boldface type." [ 2004 c 51 s 6.]

Effective date—2004 c 51: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 22, 2004]." [ 2004 c 51 s 11.]

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.